Wyoming, session 2025, HB0120.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 16-3-116 is created to read:

16-3-116. Contested cases and license hearings; right
to a jury trial.

(a) In any contested case under this act where a
person is subject to any sanction of not less than twenty
dollars ($20.00), is subject to the loss or deprivation of
HB0120

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0525
a significant liberty interest or is subject to a denial,
suspension, annulment, withdrawal or revocation of a
license, the person may request a trial by jury at the
contested case hearing. The person making a request under
this subsection shall provide notice to all parties to the
contested case.

(b) The presiding officer appointed to the contested
case shall preside over the jury trial. Upon receiving a
request for a jury trial under this section, the presiding
officer shall empanel a jury before proceeding with the
contested case hearing. A jury empaneled under this act
shall be composed of six (6) persons. The presiding officer
may request that the clerk of the appropriate court summon
jurors from the base jury list prepared under W.S. 1-11-129
and 1-11-106 to serve in a jury trial under this act.
Jurors selected to serve on a jury under this act shall be
entitled to the same fees and mileage specified in W.S.
1-11-301 through 1-11-304.

(c) Jury trials held under this act shall be held in
accordance with the Code of Civil Procedure and the Wyoming
rules of civil procedure. In conducting jury trials under
HB0120

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0525
this act, the presiding officer appointed to the contested
case shall exercise and perform the same functions, powers
and duties as are prescribed for both the judge and the
clerk of the district court in W.S. 1-11-101 through
1-11-401, insofar as practicable. For purposes of this act,
all references in the applicable statutes or rules of civil
procedure to:

(i) "Court" shall be deemed a reference to the
presiding officer of the contested case;

(ii) "Trial" shall be deemed a reference to
"hearing" or "contested case hearing";

(iii) "Plaintiff" shall be deemed a reference to
the person requesting the jury trial under this act.

(d) The decision of the jury in a contested case
hearing shall serve as the final decision of the contested
case.

Section 2. W.S. 1-11-104(b)(i), 1-11-106(a),
16-3-101(b)(xiii), 16-3-107(b) by creating a new paragraph
HB0120

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0525
(v), 16-3-109, 16-3-110, 16-3-112(a), (b)(intro), (viii),
by creating a new paragraph (ix), by renumbering (ix) as
(x) and (c), 16-3-113(c) and 16-3-114 by creating a new
subsection (d) are amended to read:

1-11-104. Causes for excusal.

(b) For the purposes of this section:

(i) A person has served on a jury during a jury
term when he is summoned to serve and he has been selected
as a juror in any court within the judicial district or as
a juror in any contested case hearing under the Wyoming
Administrative Procedure Act and has taken the oath
required under W.S. 1-11-201;

1-11-106. Jury lists; preparation of base jury lists;
selecting jury panel; certificate and summons.

(a) The list of persons selected to serve as
prospective trial jurors, compiled pursuant to W.S.
1-11-129, is the base jury list for the district court, and
the circuit court and for jury trials for contested case
HB0120

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0525
hearings under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act for
the jury term set by each court or set by the office of
administrative hearings.

16-3-101. Short title; definitions.

(b) As used in this act:

(xiii) "This act" means W.S. 16-3-101 through
16-3-115 16-3-116.

16-3-107. Contested cases; general procedure.

(b) The notice shall include a statement of:

(v) The right to request a jury trial, if the
contested case subjects the person to any sanction of not
less than twenty dollars ($20.00), the loss or deprivation
of a significant liberty interest or a denial, suspension,
annulment, withdrawal or revocation of a license. Any
statement included in the notice under this paragraph shall
also provide that a person may waive the right to a jury
trial and that the right to a jury trial shall be waived if
HB0120

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0525
the person fails to make a timely request for a jury trial
under W.S. 16-3-116.

16-3-109. Contested cases; consideration of record;
exceptions to decision; briefs and oral argument.

The agency or, if a jury is empaneled under this act, the
jury shall consider the whole record or any portion
stipulated to by the parties. For matters considered before
a presiding officer only, in the event a recommended
decision is rendered all parties shall be afforded a
reasonable opportunity to file exceptions thereto which
shall be deemed a part of the record. All parties as a
matter of right shall be permitted to file a brief with the
agency and oral argument shall be allowed in the discretion
of the agency.

16-3-110. Contested cases; final decision; contents;
notification.

(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, a
final decision or order adverse to a party in a contested
case shall be in writing or dictated into the record. The
HB0120

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0525
final decision shall include findings of fact and
conclusions of law separately stated. Findings of fact if
set forth in statutory language, shall be accompanied by a
concise and explicit statement of the underlying facts
supporting the findings.

(b) In jury trials commenced under this act, the
jury's findings and decision shall be the final decision of
the contested case. Upon receiving the jury's findings and
decision, the presiding officer shall enter a written order
reflecting the jury's findings and decision.

(c) Parties shall be notified either personally or by
mail of any decision or order. A copy of the decision and
order shall be delivered or mailed forthwith to each party
or to his attorney of record.

16-3-112. Contested cases; presiding officers;
qualifications; powers; outside personnel; hearing
officers.

(a) If not otherwise authorized by law there shall
preside at the taking of evidence in all contested cases
HB0120

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0525
the statutory agency, one (1) or more members of the body
which comprises the agency, or an employee of the agency or
an employee of another agency designated by the agency to
act as presiding officer. The functions of all those
presiding in contested cases shall be conducted in an
impartial manner. Any officer shall at any time withdraw if
he deems himself disqualified provided there are other
qualified presiding officers available to act. For all jury
trials commenced under this act, the presiding officer
shall be an employee of the office of administrative
hearings.

(b) Officers presiding at hearings shall have
authority, subject to the published rules of the agency and
within its power to perform any of the following:

(viii) Make recommended decisions when directed
to do so by the agency; and

(ix) Empanel a jury and administer necessary
oaths and affirmations to constitute a jury;

HB0120

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0525
(ix)(x) Take any other action authorized by
agency rules consistent with this act.

(c) In all contested cases to the extent that it is
necessary in order to obtain compliance with W.S. 16-3-111
the agency (excepting county and municipal agencies and
political subdivisions on the county and local level) may
request the office of the attorney general to furnish to
the agency such personnel as may be necessary in order for
the agency to properly investigate, prepare, present and
prosecute the contested case before the agency or before a
jury. The attorney general upon the receipt of the request
shall promptly comply with same with no charge being made
against the requesting agency's appropriation other than
for travel and per diem expenses.

16-3-113. License hearings.

(c) No revocation, suspension, annulment or
withdrawal of any license is lawful unless, prior to the
institution of agency proceedings, the agency gave notice
by mail to the licensee of facts or conduct which warrant
the intended action, the notice provides that the licensee
HB0120

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0525
may request a jury trial under this act and the licensee
was given an opportunity to show compliance with all lawful
requirements for the retention of the license. If the
agency finds that public health, safety or welfare
imperatively requires emergency action, and incorporates a
finding to that effect in its order, summary suspension of
a license may be ordered pending proceedings for revocation
or other action. A cancellation of a driver's license
pursuant to W.S. 31-7-121(c) shall not be valid until the
department of transportation gives notice by mail to the
licensee of the facts which warrant the intended action and
provides the licensee with an opportunity to provide
additional evidence or information with respect to the
condition at issue within fifteen (15) days of the mailing
of the notice. These proceedings shall be promptly
instituted and determined.

16-3-114. Judicial review of agency actions; district
courts.

(d) Review of agency actions taken after a jury trial
under this act shall be conducted in accordance with
HB0120

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0525
subsections (a) and (b) of this section and any rules
promulgated by the supreme court.

Section 3. This act shall apply to all contested
cases commenced on and after July 1, 2025. Nothing in this
act shall be construed to grant the right to a jury trial
for all contested cases for which a contested case or
hearing was commenced or completed before July 1, 2025.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0120